Utah statutes.
78B-3-703.   Limitation on cause of action.
A cause of action does not exist under this section if the person with a
disability who uses the service animal or the person having custody or
supervision of the service animal was committing a civil or criminal trespass
at the time of the:
(1)  theft of, or the chasing or harassment of the service animal by a person
who owns or exercises control over the property upon which the trespass is
committed; or
(2)  attack upon, or the chasing or harassment of a service animal by an
animal that is currently kept or maintained on the property where the trespass
is committed.
